Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2207.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state department of corrections; braille transcription program; reports; findings and intent A. The sum of $300,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state department of corrections for the braille transcription program. B. On or before October 15, 2026, October 15, 2027 and October 15, 2028, the state department of corrections shall submit an annual report on the braille transcription program to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the governor and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. The report shall include: 1. The number of students in this state who were served by the program in the prior fiscal year. 2. The number of students outside this state who were served by the program in the prior fiscal year. C. The legislature finds that the state department of corrections currently allocates $200,000 each fiscal year for the braille transcription program. The legislature intends that the appropriation of $300,000 made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years.